Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2341
Rules of construction and intention.

The intention of a testator as expressed in his will controls the legal effect of his dispositions. The rules of construction expressed in the succeeding sections of this part apply unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 63, UPC § 2-603.

The intention of a testator as expressed in her will controls the legal effect of her dispositions. In re Estate of Akerson, 309 Neb. 470, 960 N.W.2d 719 (2021).

The cardinal rule in construing a will is to ascertain and effectuate the testator's intent if such intent is not contrary to the law. In re Estate of Barger, 303 Neb. 817, 931 N.W.2d 660 (2019).